Wisconsin, session 2025, AB931.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the Department of Health Services and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of the bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.AB931,11Section 1. 165.25 (6) (c) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 18, 2is amended to read:AB931,2,73165.25 (6) (c) Physicians, physician assistants, and advanced practice nurse 4prescribers registered nurses under s. 251.07 or 252.04 (9) (b) are covered by this 5section and shall be considered agents of the department of health services for 6purposes of determining which agency head may request the attorney general to 7appear and defend them.AB931,28Section 2. 250.15 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB931,3,11250.15 (2) (c) To HealthNet of Janesville Rock County, Inc., $50,000.Note: This Section updates a reference to an organization from “HealthNet of Janesville, Inc.,” to “HealthNet of Rock County, Inc.” According to the Department of Health Services, the name of this organization has changed.AB931,32Section 3. 251.04 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:AB931,3,123251.04 (8) Unless the manner of employment is otherwise provided for by 4ordinance, a local board of health shall employ qualified public health professionals, 5including a public health nurse to conduct general generalized public health 6nursing programs under the direction of the local board of health and in cooperation 7with the department, and may employ one or more sanitarians to conduct 8environmental programs and other public health programs not specifically 9designated by statute as functions of the public health nurse. The local board of 10health shall coordinate the activities of any sanitarian employed by the governing 11body of the jurisdiction that the local board of health serves. The local board of 12health is not required to employ different persons to perform these functions.Note: Under ch. 250, stats., each public health nurse must conduct a “generalized” public health nursing program in cooperation with the Department of Health Services. Section 3 modifies a reference to a “general” public health nursing program in ch. 251, stats., so that it is consistent with ch. 250, stats.AB931,413Section 4. 251.07 (1) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 1418, is amended to read:AB931,3,1715251.07 (1) (a) “Advanced practice registered nurse prescriber” means an 16advanced practice nurse who is certified under s. 441.16 (2) to may issue 17prescription orders under s. 441.09 (2).AB931,518Section 5. 251.07 (2) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 18, is 19amended to read:AB931,4,520251.07 (2) A physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered 1nurse prescriber who is not an employee of the local health department and who 2provides services, without compensation, for those programs and services provided 3by a local health department that require medical oversight is, for the provision of 4the services he or she provides, a state agent of the department of health services 5for the purposes of ss. 165.25 (6), 893.82 (3), and 895.46.AB931,66Section 6. 252.04 (9) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 18, is 7amended to read:AB931,4,128252.04 (9) (a) An immunization program under sub. (8) shall be supervised by 9a physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse prescriber 10selected by the school district or local health department who shall issue written 11orders for the administration of immunizations that are in accordance with written 12protocols issued by the department.AB931,4,1813(b) If the physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse 14prescriber under par. (a) is not an employee of the county, city, village or school 15district, receives no compensation for his or her services under par. (a) and acts 16under par. (a) in accordance with written protocols issued by the department, he or 17she is a state agent of the department for the purposes of ss. 165.25 (6), 893.82 (3) 18and 895.46.AB931,4,2119(c) The department may disapprove the selection made under par. (a) or may 20require the removal of a physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 21registered nurse prescriber selected.AB931,722Section 7. 895.46 (5) (b) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2318, is amended to read:AB931,5,21895.46 (5) (b) A physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 2registered nurse prescriber under s. 251.07 or 252.04 (9) (b).AB931,83Section 8. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 4publication, except as follows:AB931,5,65(1) The treatment of ss. 165.25 (6) (c), 251.07 (1) (a) and (2), 252.04 (9), and 6895.46 (5) (b) takes effect on September 1, 2026.Note: Effective September 1, 2026, 2025 Wisconsin Act 17 creates a new system of licensure that allows a registered nurse (RN) to be licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse (APRN). Among other provisions, Act 17 directs the Board of Nursing to grant an APRN license to an RN who, on August 31, 2026, is certified as an advanced practice nurse prescriber (APNP). APRN licensure will replace certification as an APNP. Throughout the statutes, Act 17 replaces each reference to an APNP with a reference to an APRN. 2025 Wisconsin Act 18 was enacted on the same day as Act 17. Effective August 10, 2025, Act 18 authorizes an APNP to provide certain services for a local health department. Sections 1, 4, 5, 6 and 7 replace each reference in Act 18 to an APNP with a reference to an APRN. Section 8 renders these changes effective on September 1, 2026, the same day that Act 17 will take effect.AB931,5,77